src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON C_PASS_SH_RLEN !!= ** __@CODE@__ does not shorten vowel
+V+IV+Inf:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>đ K ;

+V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL:^CLEN%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !kulluuškuođij
+V+IV+Der1+Der/st:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>ust 3_DERIVED ; !
+V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAg:^CLEN^VHIGH%>j IJJE ;
+V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>m FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;

+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>um K ; ! vuoššuum
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>uh K ;  !vuoššuuh
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^CLEN^VHIGH%>o K ; ! vuáššoo
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1:^CLEN^VHIGH%>jeen K ; !vuáššojeen
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>uvettee K ; !vuoššuuvettee
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>v K ; !vuoššuv
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>p K ; !vuoššup
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>uvetteđ K ; !vuoššuuvetteđ
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^CLEN^VHIGH%>jeh K ; !vuáššojeh

+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^CLEN^VHIGH%>jim K ; ! vuáššojim
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2:^CLEN^VHIGH%>jih  K ; !vuáššojih
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>i  K ; !vuoššui
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>im  K ; ! vuoššuim
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ; !vuoššuid
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>in  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>im  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>id  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^CLEN^VHIGH%>jii  K ; !vuáššojii

+V+IV+Cond+Prs:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>u EVEN_COND ;

! Deviates from normal POT
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užeem K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg2:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užeeh K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>š K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užeen K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du2:^CSH^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du3:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užává K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl1:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užep K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^CSH^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užeh K ;

+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>u K ; !
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ; !
+V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>uččii K ;  !^CLEN^VHIGH  uápuuččii
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>užii K ;
+V+IV+PrfPrc:^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>m FLAG_K ; !puohtum
+V+IV+PrsPrc:^CLEN^VHIGH%>j IJJE_PRSPRC ;

+V+IV+VAbess:^VBACK^RLEN%>uhánnáá K ; !
+V+IV+VAbess+Err/Orth:^VBACK^RLEN%>uhinnáá K ;
+V+IV+VAbess+Err/Orth:^VBACK^RLEN%>uhennáá K ;

+V+IV+Actio+Nom:^VBACK^RLEN%>m NOMACT ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ill:^VBACK^RLEN%>umân K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Loc:^VBACK^RLEN%>umist K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Com:^VBACK^RLEN%>umáin K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ess:^VBACK^RLEN%>umin K ;
+V+IV+Ger+Err/Orth:^VBACK^RLEN%>dijn K ; !+Err/Orth?
+V+IV+Ger+PxSg1:^VBACK^RLEN%>dijnân K ; ! XXX
+V+IV+Ger+PxSg2:^VBACK^RLEN%>dijnâd K ;
+V+IV+Ger+PxSg3:^VBACK^RLEN%>dijnis K ;
+V+IV+Ger:^VBACK^RLEN%>udijn K ; !aasâttijn asât%>dijn 


LEXICON C_PASS_SH_ALTERNATE !!= ** __@CODE@__ toohum: does not shorten vowel, does not lengthen consonant, this is a Use/NG lexicon
+V+IV+Inf:^VBACK^RLEN%>đ K ; !toohuđ

+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3:^VBACK^RLEN%>v K ; !toohuv
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^VBACK^RLEN%>p K ; !toohup

+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:^VBACK^RLEN%>i  K ;  ! toohui
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1:^VBACK^RLEN%>im  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2:^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3:^VBACK^RLEN%>in  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^VBACK^RLEN%>im  K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^VBACK^RLEN%>id  K ;

+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:^VBACK^RLEN%>š K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du2:^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;

+V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ; !toohum
+V+IV+PrfPrc:^VBACK^RLEN%>m FLAG_K ; !toohum
+V+IV+Actio+Nom:^VBACK^RLEN%>m NOMACT ; ! toohum






LEXICON C_RAMMUD
+V: C_RAMMUD_V ;
LEXICON C_RAMMUD_IV
+V+IV: C_RAMMUD_V ;
LEXICON C_RAMMUD_TV
+V+TV: C_RAMMUD_V ;

LEXICON C_RAMMUD_V !!= * __@CODE@__ does not shorten vowel

VINF_SHORT_VOW ;
:%>u VINF_LONG_VOW ;
+Cond+Prs:%>u EVEN_COND ;
: C_RAMMUD_POT ;
+Imprt: CONTR_IMPRT ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:%>uškyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !kulluuškuođij
+Der1+Der/tt:%>utt 3_COKKIITTID ; !rahhiittiđ ruvviittiđ
+Der1+Der/st:%>ust 3_COKKIITTID ; !ruvviistiđ
:u^SLEN DER_MAS ; ! rammuumâš
+Der3+Der/Pass: C_PASS_LONG ;

+PrsPrc:%>j IJJE_PRSPRC ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>um K ; !^VBACK?
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>o K ; ! jf. C_TUHHID
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jeen K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>jeh K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jii  K ; !a-

+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>uh K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>uvettee K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>v K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>uvetteđ K ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>jih  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>im  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>id K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>in  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id  K ;


LEXICON C_RAMMUD_POT  !!= ** __@CODE@__ umify this and next
+Pot+Prs+Sg1:%>užeem K ;
+Pot+Prs+Sg2:%>užeeh K ;
+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>š K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du1:%>užeen K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du2:%>švettee K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du3:%>užává K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl1:%>užep K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl2:%>švetteđ K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl3:%>užeh K ;


LEXICON CONTR_POT !!= * __@CODE@__ unify this and previous
+Sg1:%>žeem K ;
+Sg2:%>žeeh K ;
+Sg3:^SVSH%>š K ;
+Du1:%>žeen K ;
+Du2:%>švettee K ;
+Du3:%>žává K ;	
+Pl1:%>žep K ;
+Pl2:%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:%>žeh K ;

LEXICON CONTR_IMPRT
+Sg1:%>jum K ;
+Sg2:%>^VO K ;
+Sg3:%>jus K ;
+Du1:%>joon K ;
+Du2:%>jee K ;
+Du3:%>jus K ;
+Pl1:%>jop K ;
+Pl2:%>đ K ;
+Pl3:%>jus K ;




LEXICON VINF_SHORT_VOW

+Inf:%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>m K ;
+PrfPrc:%>m K ;
+Actio+Nom:%>m NOMACT ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:%>j IJJE ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ; !škuvlim, *škuávlim
!+Der4+Der/NomAct:^VBACK%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;

LEXICON VINF_LONG_VOW

+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>žii K ;
+VAbess: VABESS ;
+Actio+Ill:%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:%>máin K ;
+Actio+Com+Err/Orth:%>mijn K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>min K ;
+Ger:%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:%>dijnis K ;


LEXICON C_PASS_SH_POHTED  !!= ** __@CODE@__ shortens long vow in certain forms
:^CLEN C_PASS_SH_COMMON ;
+V+IV+Cond+Prs:^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg1:^WG%>žeem K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg2:^WG%>žeeh K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:^WG%>š K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du1:^WG%>žeen K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du2:^WG^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du3:^WG%>žává K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl1:^WG%>žep K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^WG^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>žeh K ;

LEXICON C_PASS_SH  !!= ** __@CODE@__ shortens long vow in certain forms
 C_PASS_SH_COMMON ;
+V+IV+Cond+Prs:%>u EVEN_COND ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg1:%>užeem K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg2:%>užeeh K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>š K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du1:%>užeen K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du2:^RLEN%>švettee K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Du3:%>užává K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl1:%>užep K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
!pp!+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3:%>užeh K ;
